Utah statutes.
10-15-6.   Public hearing -- Finance requirements.

The designation of any street as a "mall" shall be by ordinance passed and published after full investigation and ample public hearing into the necessity and advisability of the creation of a mall.  The ordinance shall designate the manner in which the project is to be financed, and, if financed by levy of special taxes or special improvement warrants or bonds, shall be in accordance with the provisions of Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act.

